District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-217.02

District government contracting with local business enterprises; quarterly agency reports on contracts; Council review of goals.

Repealed.

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-268, § 3, 46 DCR 969
Oct. 14, 1999, D.C. Law 13-49, § 13(b), 46 DCR 5153
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-169, § 2(b), 47 DCR 5846
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2382(b), 52 DCR 7503
1981 Ed., § 1-1153.2.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-216, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3458).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Local, Small and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Program Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-291, April 4, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 5849).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Local, Small and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Program Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-291, April 4, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 5849).
For temporary (90-day) addition of Subchapter II-B [1981 Ed.], see notes following § 2-217.01.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-415, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7296).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Local, Small and Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-598, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 658).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2382(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).